test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-14hamwh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hamõh: # Noun (14RITSʼKAS =>PEREH) hamõh 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hamõh+N+Sg+Nom: hamõh
     hamõh+N+Sg+Gen: hammõ
     hamõh+N+Sg+Par: hamõht
     hamõh+N+Sg+Ill: [hammõhe, hammõdõ]
     hamõh+N+Sg+Ine: [hammõn, hammõh, hammõhn]
     hamõh+N+Sg+Ela: hammõst
     hamõh+N+Sg+All: hammõlõ
     hamõh+N+Sg+Ade: hammõl
     hamõh+N+Sg+Abl: hammõlt
     hamõh+N+Sg+Tra: hammõs
     hamõh+N+Sg+Ter: hammõniq
     hamõh+N+Sg+Abe: hammõldaq
     hamõh+N+Sg+Com: hammõgaq
     hamõh+N+Pl+Nom: hammõq
     hamõh+N+Pl+Gen: [hammidõ, hammiidõ, hamõhtõ]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Par: [hammit, hammiid]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Ill: [hammihe, hammiihe, hammidõ, hammiidõ, hamõhtõhe, hamõhtõdõ]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Ine: [hammin, hammiin, hammih, hammiih, hammihn, hammiihn, hamõhtõn, hamõhtõh, hamõhtõhn]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Ela: [hammist, hammiist, hamõhtõst]
     hamõh+N+Pl+All: [hammilõ, hammiilõ, hamõhtõlõ]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Ade: [hammil, hammiil, hamõhtõl]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Abl: [hammilt, hammiilt, hamõhtõlt]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Tra: [hammis, hammiis, hamõhtõs]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Ter: [hamminiq, hammiiniq, hamõhtõniq]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Abe: [hammildaq, hammiildaq, hamõhtõldaq]
     hamõh+N+Pl+Com: [hammidõgaq, hammiidõgaq, hamõhtõgaq]
